Colorado, session 2026A, SB008.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Colorado:
SECTION 1. In Colorado Revised Statutes, add part 6 to article
60 of title 27 as follows:
PART 6
MENTAL HEALTH ACCESS AND ENTERPRISE
27-60-601. Short title.
THE SHORT TITLE OF THIS PART 6 IS THE "COLORADO MENTAL
HEALTH ACCESS ACT".
27-60-602. Legislative declaration.
(1) THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY FINDS AND DECLARES THAT:
(a) MENTAL HEALTH SERVICES PROGRAMS THAT UTILIZE THE
-2- SB26-008

INTERNET TO FACILITATE MENTAL HEALTH SERVICES PROVIDE VALUABLE
BENEFITS TO INTERNET SERVICE ACCOUNT HOLDERS BY MAKING MENTAL
HEALTH SERVICES ACCESSIBLE TO EVERYONE IN THE STATE. COLORADANS'
ACCESS TO MENTAL HEALTH SERVICES HAS INCREASED DUE TO THE
AVAILABILITY OF TELEHEALTH APPOINTMENTS, WHICH USE THE INTERNET
TO CONDUCT VIDEO OR AUDIO APPOINTMENTS. TELEHEALTH ALLOWS A
PROVIDER TO ASSESS, DIAGNOSE, CONSULT, TREAT, AND PROVIDE CARE
MANAGEMENT SERVICES FOR A PERSON LOCATED AT A DIFFERENT SITE
FROM THE PROVIDER. MENTAL HEALTH SERVICE PROGRAMS THAT UTILIZE
THE INTERNET, INCLUDING THE ADULT MENTAL HEALTH SERVICES
PROGRAM CREATED IN THIS PART 6, WILL PROVIDE VALUABLE BENEFITS
AND SERVICES TO INTERNET SERVICE ACCOUNT HOLDERS STATEWIDE
WHEN THE MENTAL HEALTH SERVICES ENTERPRISE FUNDS THE PROGRAMS.
THE PROGRAMS WILL FACILITATE INCREASED ACCESS TO MENTAL HEALTH
SERVICES AVAILABLE FROM ANY JURISDICTION IN COLORADO.
(b) BY PROVIDING THE BENEFITS AND SERVICES SPECIFIED IN
SUBSECTION (1)(a) OF THIS SECTION, THE MENTAL HEALTH SERVICES
ENTERPRISE ENGAGES IN AN ACTIVITY CONDUCTED IN THE PURSUIT OF A
BENEFIT, GAIN, OR LIVELIHOOD, AND THEREFORE OPERATES AS A
BUSINESS;
(c) CONSISTENT WITH THE DETERMINATION OF THE COLORADO
SUPREME COURT IN NICHOLL V. E-470 PUBLIC HIGHWAY AUTHORITY, 896
P.2d 859 (COLO. 1995), THAT THE POWER TO IMPOSE TAXES IS
INCONSISTENT WITH ENTERPRISE STATUS UNDER SECTION 20 OF ARTICLE
X OF THE STATE CONSTITUTION, IT IS THE CONCLUSION OF THE GENERAL
ASSEMBLY THAT THE SURCHARGE IMPOSED BY THE ENTERPRISE IS A FEE,
NOT A TAX, BECAUSE THE SURCHARGE IS IMPOSED FOR THE SPECIFIC
-3- SB26-008

PURPOSE OF ALLOWING THE ENTERPRISE TO DEFRAY THE COSTS OF
PROVIDING THE BENEFITS AND SERVICES SPECIFIED IN SUBSECTION (1)(a)
OF THIS SECTION TO USERS OF INTERNET SERVICE ACCOUNTS AND THE
SURCHARGE IS IMPOSED AT A RATE THAT IS REASONABLY CALCULATED
BASED ON THE COST OF THE SERVICES RECEIVED BY USERS OF INTERNET
SERVICE ACCOUNTS;
(d) SO LONG AS THE MENTAL HEALTH SERVICES ENTERPRISE
QUALIFIES AS AN ENTERPRISE FOR PURPOSES OF SECTION 20 OF ARTICLE X
OF THE STATE CONSTITUTION, THE REVENUE FROM THE SURCHARGE
IMPOSED BY THE ENTERPRISE IS NOT STATE FISCAL YEAR SPENDING, AS
DEFINED IN SECTION 24-77-102 (17), OR STATE REVENUES, AS DEFINED IN
SECTION 24-77-103.6 (6)(c), AND DOES NOT COUNT AGAINST EITHER THE
STATE FISCAL YEAR SPENDING LIMIT IMPOSED BY SECTION 20 OF ARTICLE
X OF THE STATE CONSTITUTION OR THE EXCESS STATE REVENUES CAP, AS
DEFINED IN SECTION 24-77-103.6 (6)(b)(I); AND
(e) NO OTHER ENTERPRISE CREATED SIMULTANEOUSLY OR WITHIN
THE PRECEDING FIVE YEARS SERVES PRIMARILY THE SAME PURPOSE AS THE
MENTAL HEALTH SERVICES ENTERPRISE, AND THE MENTAL HEALTH
SERVICES ENTERPRISE WILL GENERATE REVENUE FROM SURCHARGES OF
LESS THAN ONE HUNDRED MILLION DOLLARS TOTAL IN ITS FIRST FIVE
FISCAL YEARS. ACCORDINGLY, THE CREATION OF THE MENTAL HEALTH
SERVICES ENTERPRISE DOES NOT REQUIRE VOTER APPROVAL PURSUANT TO
SECTION 24-77-108.
27-60-603. Definitions.
AS USED IN THIS PART 6, UNLESS THE CONTEXT OTHERWISE
REQUIRES:
(1) "ADULT MENTAL HEALTH SERVICES PROGRAM" OR "PROGRAM"
-4- SB26-008

MEANS THE PROGRAM CREATED IN SECTION 27-60-604.
(2) "BEHAVIORAL HEALTH ADMINISTRATION" OR "BHA" MEANS
THE BEHAVIORAL HEALTH ADMINISTRATION ESTABLISHED IN SECTION
27-50-102.
(3) "ELIGIBLE ADULT" MEANS AN INDIVIDUAL WHO IS NOT A
YOUTH, AS DEFINED IN SECTION 27-60-109 (1)(e).
(4) "ENTERPRISE" MEANS THE MENTAL HEALTH SERVICES
ENTERPRISE CREATED IN SECTION 27-60-606.
(5) "GRANT PROGRAM" MEANS THE INTERNET-ENABLED MENTAL
HEALTH ACCESS GRANT PROGRAM CREATED IN SECTION 27-60-605.
(6) "INTERNET SERVICE ACCOUNT HOLDER" OR "ACCOUNT
HOLDER" MEANS A PERSON WHO MAINTAINS AN ACCOUNT WITH AN
INTERNET SERVICE PROVIDER TO RECEIVE BROADBAND INTERNET ACCESS
SERVICE, AS DEFINED IN SECTION 40-15-209 (4)(a).
(7) "INTERNET SERVICE PROVIDER" HAS THE MEANING SET FORTH
IN SECTION 40-15-209 (4)(b).
(8) "MENTAL HEALTH SERVICE PROVIDER" MEANS A LICENSED
PSYCHIATRIST REGULATED PURSUANT TO ARTICLE 240 OF TITLE 12 OR ANY
OF THE FOLLOWING LICENSEES, CERTIFIED PROFESSIONALS, OR
CANDIDATES REGULATED PURSUANT TO ARTICLE 245 OF TITLE 12: A
LICENSED PSYCHOLOGIST OR PSYCHOLOGIST CANDIDATE; LICENSED SOCIAL
WORKER, LICENSED CLINICAL SOCIAL WORKER, OR CLINICAL SOCIAL
WORKER CANDIDATE; LICENSED MARRIAGE AND FAMILY THERAPIST OR
MARRIAGE AND FAMILY THERAPIST CANDIDATE; LICENSED PROFESSIONAL
COUNSELOR OR LICENSED PROFESSIONAL COUNSELOR CANDIDATE; OR
LICENSED ADDICTION COUNSELOR, CERTIFIED ADDICTION SPECIALIST, OR
ADDICTION COUNSELOR CANDIDATE.
-5- SB26-008

(9) "MENTAL HEALTH SERVICES ENTERPRISE CASH FUND" OR
"FUND" MEANS THE MENTAL HEALTH SERVICES ENTERPRISE CASH FUND
CREATED IN SECTION 27-60-606 (5).
(10) "PARTICIPANT" MEANS AN INDIVIDUAL WHO PARTICIPATES IN
A MENTAL HEALTH SESSION THAT IS REIMBURSED PURSUANT TO THE
PROGRAM.
(11) "PORTAL" MEANS THE WEBSITE OR WEB-BASED APPLICATION
DESCRIBED IN SECTION 27-60-604 (3) THAT FACILITATES THE PROGRAM.
(12) "SURCHARGE" MEANS THE MENTAL HEALTH SERVICES ACCESS
SURCHARGE IMPOSED BY THE ENTERPRISE PURSUANT TO SECTION
27-60-606 (2)(a).
(13) "TELEHEALTH" HAS THE SAME MEANING SET FORTH IN
SECTION 10-16-123 (4)(e).
27-60-604. Adult mental health services program - created -
report - rules.
(1) (a) THE ADULT MENTAL HEALTH SERVICES PROGRAM IS
ESTABLISHED TO FACILITATE ELIGIBLE ADULTS' ACCESS TO MENTAL
HEALTH SERVICES, INCLUDING SUBSTANCE USE DISORDER SERVICES, AND
TO RESPOND TO MENTAL HEALTH NEEDS IDENTIFIED IN AN INITIAL MENTAL
HEALTH SCREENING CONDUCTED THROUGH THE PORTAL. THE PROGRAM
REIMBURSES MENTAL HEALTH SERVICE PROVIDERS FOR UP TO SIX MENTAL
HEALTH SESSIONS WITH AN ELIGIBLE ADULT.
(b) THE MENTAL HEALTH SERVICES ENTERPRISE SHALL CREATE,
OPERATE, AND FUND THE PROGRAM. THE ENTERPRISE SHALL CONSULT
WITH THE BHA IN THE CREATION AND OPERATION OF THE PROGRAM.
(c) THE PROGRAM MUST REIMBURSE MENTAL HEALTH SERVICE
PROVIDERS WHO PARTICIPATE IN THE PROGRAM FOR EACH MENTAL HEALTH
-6- SB26-008

SESSION WITH A PARTICIPANT, EITHER IN PERSON OR BY TELEHEALTH, UP
TO A MAXIMUM OF SIX SESSIONS PER PARTICIPANT; EXCEPT THAT, SUBJECT
TO AVAILABLE MONEY, THE PROGRAM MAY REIMBURSE A PROVIDER FOR
ADDITIONAL SESSIONS. TO BE ELIGIBLE FOR REIMBURSEMENT FROM THE
PROGRAM, A MENTAL HEALTH SERVICE PROVIDER MUST BE AVAILABLE TO
PROVIDE AT LEAST SIX MENTAL HEALTH SESSIONS TO EACH PARTICIPANT
THE PROVIDER ACCEPTS AS A CLIENT.
(d) A MENTAL HEALTH SERVICE PROVIDER SHALL MAINTAIN CLIENT
CONFIDENTIALITY PURSUANT TO STATE OR FEDERAL LAW WITH REGARD TO
A CLIENT WHO PARTICIPATES IN A MENTAL HEALTH SESSION WITH THE
PROVIDER WHO IS REIMBURSED PURSUANT TO THE PROGRAM.
(2) (a) THE ENTERPRISE SHALL:
(I) DEVELOP A PROCESS CONSISTENT WITH THE REQUIREMENTS OF
THIS SECTION FOR MENTAL HEALTH SERVICE PROVIDERS TO APPLY FOR,
AND DEMONSTRATE ELIGIBILITY TO RECEIVE, REIMBURSEMENT FROM THE
PROGRAM;
(II) DETERMINE A REASONABLE RATE OF REIMBURSEMENT FOR
EACH MENTAL HEALTH SESSION PROVIDED PURSUANT TO THE PROGRAM.
THE RATE MUST BE THE SAME REGARDLESS OF WHETHER THE
APPOINTMENT IS AN IN-PERSON OR TELEHEALTH APPOINTMENT.
(III) IMPLEMENT A STATEWIDE PUBLIC AWARENESS AND OUTREACH
CAMPAIGN ABOUT THE PROGRAM. THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY ENCOURAGES
THE ENTERPRISE TO INVOLVE HEALTH-CARE PROVIDERS, FAITH-BASED
ORGANIZATIONS, AND OTHER COMMUNITY-BASED ORGANIZATIONS IN
DISSEMINATING INFORMATION ABOUT THE PROGRAM.
(b) THE ENTERPRISE MAY ADOPT RULES NECESSARY FOR THE
ADMINISTRATION OF THIS SECTION, INCLUDING RULES TO PROTECT THE
-7- SB26-008

PRIVACY OF PROGRAM PARTICIPANTS.
(3) THE ENTERPRISE SHALL ENTER INTO AN AGREEMENT WITH A
VENDOR TO CREATE OR USE AN EXISTING WEBSITE OR WEB-BASED
APPLICATION AS A PORTAL THAT IS AVAILABLE TO ELIGIBLE ADULTS,
PARTICIPANTS, AND MENTAL HEALTH SERVICE PROVIDERS TO FACILITATE
THE PROGRAM. THE PORTAL MUST:
(a) SERVE AS A PLATFORM FOR INITIAL MENTAL HEALTH
SCREENINGS TO DETERMINE IF AN ELIGIBLE ADULT MAY BENEFIT FROM
MENTAL HEALTH SUPPORT;
(b) ALLOW MENTAL HEALTH SERVICE PROVIDERS TO REGISTER AND
SHARE IN-PERSON OR TELEHEALTH APPOINTMENT AVAILABILITY;
(c) WHEN POSSIBLE, CONNECT AN ELIGIBLE ADULT WITH MENTAL
HEALTH SERVICE PROVIDERS WHO ACCEPT THE ELIGIBLE ADULT'S
INSURANCE OR PAYMENT SOURCE, WHICH MAY COVER THE COSTS OF
ONGOING MENTAL HEALTH TREATMENT, IF THE ELIGIBLE ADULT HAS
INSURANCE OR A PAYMENT SOURCE; AND
(d) ALLOW AN ELIGIBLE ADULT, REGARDLESS OF WHETHER THE
ELIGIBLE ADULT HAS INSURANCE OR ANY OTHER PAYMENT SOURCE, TO
SCHEDULE TELEHEALTH APPOINTMENTS WITH A MENTAL HEALTH SERVICE
PROVIDER. AN IN-PERSON APPOINTMENT MAY BE PROVIDED IF AND WHEN
AVAILABLE.
(4) (a) ON OR BEFORE JUNE 1, 2028, AND ON OR BEFORE JUNE 1 OF
EACH YEAR THEREAFTER, THE VENDOR DESCRIBED IN SUBSECTION (3) OF
THIS SECTION SHALL DELIVER TO THE ENTERPRISE ANY OF THE FOLLOWING,
COLLECTED DURING THE PRIOR YEAR:
(I) INFORMATION ABOUT THE PROGRAM COLLECTED FROM
SURVEYS OF PARTICIPANTS AND MENTAL HEALTH SERVICE PROVIDERS;
-8- SB26-008

AND
(II) DATA FROM EVALUATIONS CONDUCTED BY THE VENDOR
ABOUT THE EFFICACY OF THE PROGRAM, INCLUDING WHETHER THE
PROGRAM IS SERVING THE MENTAL HEALTH NEEDS OF PARTICIPANTS.
(b) ON A SCHEDULE DETERMINED BY THE ENTERPRISE, BUT AT
LEAST ANNUALLY, THE ENTERPRISE SHALL CONDUCT A SURVEY OF EACH
MENTAL HEALTH SERVICE PROVIDER WHO PARTICIPATES IN THE PROGRAM
THAT SOLICITS FEEDBACK ABOUT THE FOLLOWING:
(I) THE MET AND UNMET MENTAL HEALTH NEEDS OF THE
PARTICIPANTS WHO RECEIVED TREATMENT FROM THE PROVIDER;
(II) WHETHER THE PROVIDER MADE REFERRALS FOR PARTICIPANTS
FOR ADDITIONAL SERVICES BEYOND WHAT IS PROVIDED PURSUANT TO THE
PROGRAM; AND
(III) ANY OTHER ELEMENTS OF THE PROGRAM.
(c) THE ENTERPRISE SHALL PROVIDE INFORMATION TO THE STATE
DEPARTMENT, INCLUDING INFORMATION LEARNED FROM VENDORS AND
MENTAL HEALTH SERVICE PROVIDERS PURSUANT TO SUBSECTIONS (4)(a)
AND (4)(b) OF THIS SECTION, NECESSARY FOR THE STATE DEPARTMENT TO
MAKE ITS REPORT DESCRIBED IN SUBSECTION (5) OF THIS SECTION TO THE
HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES HEALTH AND HUMAN SERVICES COMMITTEE
AND THE SENATE HEALTH AND HUMAN SERVICES COMMITTEE, OR ANY
SUCCESSOR COMMITTEE.
(d) THIS SUBSECTION (4) DOES NOT AUTHORIZE THE ENTERPRISE,
THE STATE DEPARTMENT, THE BHA, A MENTAL HEALTH SERVICE
PROVIDER, A VENDOR, OR ANY OTHER PERSON TO VIOLATE APPLICABLE
FEDERAL OR STATE PATIENT PRIVACY LAWS.
(5) (a) ON OR BEFORE JUNE 30, 2027, AND ON OR BEFORE JUNE 30
-9- SB26-008

OF EACH YEAR THEREAFTER, THE STATE DEPARTMENT SHALL REPORT TO
THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES HEALTH AND HUMAN SERVICES
COMMITTEE AND THE SENATE HEALTH AND HUMAN SERVICES COMMITTEE,
OR THEIR SUCCESSOR COMMITTEES, REGARDING THE NUMBER OF
PARTICIPANTS WHO RECEIVED SERVICES UNDER THE PROGRAM, EXCLUDING
ANY PERSONALLY IDENTIFIABLE INFORMATION IN ACCORDANCE WITH
STATE AND FEDERAL LAW; INFORMATION IN AGGREGATE ABOUT THE
SERVICES PROVIDED TO PARTICIPANTS UNDER THE PROGRAM; OTHER
RELEVANT INFORMATION REGARDING THE PROGRAM; AND THE
INFORMATION REPORTED TO THE ENTERPRISE BY THE VENDOR PURSUANT
TO SUBSECTION (4)(a) OF THIS SECTION.
(b) NOTWITHSTANDING SECTION 24-1-136 (11)(a)(I), THE
REQUIREMENT TO SUBMIT THE REPORT REQUIRED IN THIS SUBSECTION (5)
CONTINUES INDEFINITELY.
27-60-605. Internet-enabled mental health access grant
program - policies, procedures, and guidelines - report.
(1) (a) THE INTERNET-ENABLED MENTAL HEALTH ACCESS GRANT
PROGRAM IS CREATED TO AWARD GRANTS TO ENTITIES THAT USE THE
INTERNET TO FACILITATE MENTAL HEALTH SERVICES.
(b) THE MENTAL HEALTH SERVICES ENTERPRISE SHALL CREATE,
OPERATE, AND FUND THE GRANT PROGRAM. THE ENTERPRISE SHALL
CONSULT WITH THE BHA IN THE CREATION AND OPERATION OF THE GRANT
PROGRAM.
(2) TO BE ELIGIBLE FOR A GRANT AWARD, AN ENTITY MUST
OPERATE A PROGRAM THAT USES THE INTERNET, INCLUDING A WEBSITE,
ONLINE SERVICE, ONLINE APPLICATION, OR MOBILE APPLICATION, TO
FACILITATE ACCESS TO OR PROVIDE MENTAL HEALTH SERVICES, INCLUDING
-10- SB26-008

SCREENING FOR MENTAL HEALTH NEEDS, FACILITATING PROVIDER
REFERRALS, OR HOSTING TELEHEALTH MENTAL HEALTH APPOINTMENTS.
AN ENTITY IS NOT REQUIRED TO EXCLUSIVELY USE THE INTERNET TO
FACILITATE ACCESS TO OR PROVIDE SERVICES TO BE ELIGIBLE FOR A GRANT
AWARD.
(3) (a) THE ENTERPRISE SHALL ADOPT, AND POST PUBLICLY ON THE
BHA'S WEBSITE, POLICIES, PROCEDURES, AND GUIDELINES FOR THE GRANT
PROGRAM THAT INCLUDE, AT A MINIMUM:
(I) PROCEDURES AND TIME LINES BY WHICH AN ELIGIBLE RECIPIENT
MAY APPLY FOR A GRANT;
(II) CRITERIA FOR DETERMINING GRANT ELIGIBILITY AND THE
AMOUNT OF GRANT AWARDS; AND
(III) REPORTING REQUIREMENTS FOR GRANT RECIPIENTS THAT
INCLUDE REPORTING THE USE OF A GRANT AWARD.
(b) THE ENTERPRISE SHALL REVIEW GRANT APPLICATIONS AND
AWARD GRANTS IN ACCORDANCE WITH THE GRANT PROGRAM'S POLICIES,
PROCEDURES, AND GUIDELINES.
(4) (a) ON OR BEFORE JANUARY 31, 2028, AND ON OR BEFORE
JANUARY 31 OF EACH YEAR THEREAFTER, THE ENTERPRISE SHALL SUBMIT
A REPORT TO THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES HEALTH AND HUMAN
SERVICES COMMITTEE AND THE SENATE HEALTH AND HUMAN SERVICES
COMMITTEE, OR THEIR SUCCESSOR COMMITTEES, WITH INFORMATION
ABOUT THE GRANT PROGRAM'S ACTIVITIES DURING THE PRECEDING YEAR.
THE ENTERPRISE SHALL ALSO POST THE ANNUAL REPORT ON THE BHA'S
WEBSITE. THE REPORT MUST INCLUDE THE NUMBER AND TOTAL AMOUNT
OF GRANTS AWARDED BY THE GRANT PROGRAM, THE RECIPIENT AND
AMOUNT OF EACH GRANT AWARDED, AND THE USE OF EACH GRANT
-11- SB26-008

AWARD.
(b) NOTWITHSTANDING THE REQUIREMENT IN SECTION 24-1-136
(11)(a)(I), THE REQUIREMENT TO SUBMIT THE REPORT REQUIRED IN THIS
SUBSECTION (4) CONTINUES INDEFINITELY.
27-60-606. Mental health services enterprise - created - board
- powers and duties - rules and policies - cash fund - repeal.
(1) (a) THERE IS CREATED IN THE BEHAVIORAL HEALTH
ADMINISTRATION THE MENTAL HEALTH SERVICES ENTERPRISE. THE
ENTERPRISE IS AND OPERATES AS A GOVERNMENT-OWNED BUSINESS
WITHIN THE BHA FOR THE BUSINESS PURPOSE OF IMPOSING AND
COLLECTING SURCHARGES PURSUANT TO THIS SECTION, AND UTILIZING THE
SURCHARGE REVENUE TO CREATE, OPERATE, AND FUND THE ADULT
MENTAL HEALTH SERVICES PROGRAM AND THE INTERNET-ENABLED
MENTAL HEALTH ACCESS GRANT PROGRAM. THE ENTERPRISE IS A TYPE 1
ENTITY, AS DEFINED IN SECTION 24-1-105, AND EXERCISES ITS POWER AND
PERFORMS ITS DUTIES AND FUNCTIONS UNDER THE BHA.
(b) THE ENTERPRISE CONSTITUTES AN ENTERPRISE FOR PURPOSES
OF SECTION 20 OF ARTICLE X OF THE STATE CONSTITUTION SO LONG AS IT
RETAINS THE AUTHORITY TO ISSUE REVENUE BONDS AND RECEIVES LESS
THAN TEN PERCENT OF ITS TOTAL REVENUES IN GRANTS FROM ALL
COLORADO STATE AND LOCAL GOVERNMENTS COMBINED. SO LONG AS IT
CONSTITUTES AN ENTERPRISE PURSUANT TO THIS SUBSECTION (1), THE
ENTERPRISE IS NOT SUBJECT TO SECTION 20 OF ARTICLE X OF THE STATE
CONSTITUTION.
(c) THE ENTERPRISE IS GOVERNED BY A BOARD OF DIRECTORS
APPOINTED BY THE GOVERNOR.
(2) THE ENTERPRISE'S PRIMARY POWERS AND DUTIES ARE TO:
-12- SB26-008

(a) EFFECTIVE JANUARY 1, 2027, IMPOSE A MENTAL HEALTH
SERVICES ACCESS SURCHARGE ON INTERNET SERVICE ACCOUNT HOLDERS
IN AN AMOUNT ESTABLISHED ANNUALLY BY THE ENTERPRISE, BUT NOT TO
EXCEED TWENTY-FIVE CENTS PER MONTH PER ACCOUNT. ON OR BEFORE
OCTOBER 1, 2026, AND ON OR BEFORE OCTOBER 1 OF EACH YEAR
THEREAFTER, THE ENTERPRISE SHALL ESTABLISH THE AMOUNT OF THE
SURCHARGE FOR THE NEXT CALENDAR YEAR AND PUBLISH THE
SURCHARGE AMOUNT ON THE BHA'S WEBSITE. THE AMOUNT OF THE
SURCHARGE MUST BE REASONABLY CALCULATED BASED ON THE COST OF
THE SERVICES RECEIVED BY INTERNET SERVICE ACCOUNT HOLDERS
THROUGH THE ADULT MENTAL HEALTH SERVICES PROGRAM AND
PROGRAMS FUNDED THROUGH THE INTERNET-ENABLED MENTAL HEALTH
ACCESS GRANT PROGRAM.
(b) AS REQUIRED BY SECTION 27-60-604, CREATE, OPERATE, AND
FUND THE ADULT MENTAL HEALTH SERVICES PROGRAM;
(c) AS REQUIRED BY SECTION 27-60-605, CREATE, OPERATE, AND
FUND THE INTERNET-ENABLED MENTAL HEALTH ACCESS GRANT PROGRAM;
(d) ENTER INTO CONTRACTS NECESSARY FOR PROFESSIONAL AND
TECHNICAL ASSISTANCE AND ADVICE AND TO SUPPLY OTHER SERVICES
RELATED TO THE CONDUCT OF THE AFFAIRS OF THE ENTERPRISE, WITHOUT
REGARD TO THE "PROCUREMENT CODE", ARTICLES 101 TO 112 OF TITLE
24;
(e) BY RESOLUTION, AUTHORIZE AND ISSUE REVENUE BONDS THAT
ARE PAYABLE ONLY FROM THE MONEY IN THE MENTAL HEALTH SERVICES
ENTERPRISE CASH FUND;
(f) ADOPT RULES AS NECESSARY TO CARRY OUT THIS PART 6,
INCLUDING RULES THAT ESTABLISH SURCHARGE REMITTANCE PROCEDURES
-13- SB26-008

THAT ARE CONSISTENT WITH SECTION 27-60-607 (4)(a); AND
(g) ADOPT POLICIES FOR THE REGULATION OF ITS AFFAIRS AND THE
CONDUCT OF ITS BUSINESS CONSISTENT WITH THIS PART 6.
(3) (a) THE ENTERPRISE IS SUBJECT TO THE OPEN MEETINGS
PROVISIONS OF THE "COLORADO SUNSHINE ACT OF 1972", PART 4 OF
ARTICLE 6 OF TITLE 24.
(b) THE ENTERPRISE IS SUBJECT TO THE "COLORADO OPEN
RECORDS ACT", PART 2 OF ARTICLE 72 OF TITLE 24. FOR PURPOSES OF THE
"COLORADO OPEN RECORDS ACT", PART 2 OF ARTICLE 72 OF TITLE 24,
AND EXCEPT AS MAY OTHERWISE BE PROVIDED BY FEDERAL LAW OR
REGULATION OR STATE LAW, THE RECORDS OF THE ENTERPRISE ARE PUBLIC
RECORDS, AS DEFINED IN SECTION 24-72-202 (6), REGARDLESS OF
WHETHER THE ENTERPRISE RECEIVES LESS THAN TEN PERCENT OF ITS
TOTAL ANNUAL REVENUE IN GRANTS, AS DEFINED IN SECTION 24-77-102
(7), FROM ALL COLORADO STATE AND LOCAL GOVERNMENTS COMBINED.
(c) THE ENTERPRISE IS A PUBLIC ENTITY FOR PURPOSES OF THE
"SUPPLEMENTAL PUBLIC SECURITIES ACT", PART 2 OF ARTICLE 57 OF
TITLE 11.
(4) THE BHA SHALL PROVIDE OFFICE SPACE AND ADMINISTRATIVE
STAFF TO THE ENTERPRISE PURSUANT TO A CONTRACT ENTERED INTO
PURSUANT TO SUBSECTION (2)(c) OF THIS SECTION.
(5) (a) THE MENTAL HEALTH SERVICES ENTERPRISE CASH FUND IS
CREATED IN THE STATE TREASURY. THE FUND CONSISTS OF MONEY
CREDITED TO THE FUND IN ACCORDANCE WITH THIS PART 6; ANY MONEY
RECEIVED FROM THE ISSUANCE OF REVENUE BONDS, AS DESCRIBED IN
SUBSECTION (2)(d) OF THIS SECTION; AND ANY OTHER MONEY THAT THE
GENERAL ASSEMBLY MAY APPROPRIATE OR TRANSFER TO THE FUND.
-14- SB26-008

(b) THE STATE TREASURER SHALL CREDIT ALL INTEREST AND
INCOME DERIVED FROM THE DEPOSIT AND INVESTMENT OF MONEY IN THE
FUND TO THE FUND.
(c) MONEY IN THE FUND IS CONTINUOUSLY APPROPRIATED TO THE
ENTERPRISE. THE ENTERPRISE MAY EXPEND MONEY FROM THE FUND FOR
THE PURPOSES OF THIS PART 6. IN EACH FISCAL YEAR, THE ENTERPRISE
MUST FULLY FUND THE MINIMUM REQUIREMENTS OF THE ADULT MENTAL
HEALTH SERVICES PROGRAM SET FORTH IN SECTION 27-60-604 BEFORE
EXPENDING MONEY FROM THE FUND FOR THE INTERNET-ENABLED MENTAL
HEALTH ACCESS GRANT PROGRAM.
(d) (I) SECTION 24-77-108 DOES NOT APPLY TO THE ENTERPRISE
BECAUSE THE TOTAL AMOUNT OF MONEY CREDITED OR APPROPRIATED TO
THE MENTAL HEALTH SERVICES ENTERPRISE CASH FUND AS THE MENTAL
HEALTH SERVICES ACCESS SURCHARGE SHALL NOT EXCEED ONE HUNDRED
MILLION DOLLARS IN THE FIRST FIVE FISCAL YEARS OF THE ENTERPRISE'S
EXISTENCE.
(II) THIS SUBSECTION (5)(d) IS REPEALED, EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2033.
(e) THE BOARD MAY SEEK, ACCEPT, AND EXPEND GIFTS, GRANTS,
OR DONATIONS FROM PRIVATE OR PUBLIC SOURCES FOR THE PURPOSES OF
THIS SECTION, SO LONG AS THE COMBINATION OF GRANTS FROM STATE AND
LOCAL GOVERNMENTS IS LESS THAN TEN PERCENT OF THE ENTERPRISE'S
TOTAL ANNUAL REVENUE.
27-60-607. Remittance of mental health services access
surcharges - incorrect or delinquent reports - penalties -
administrative fees - rules.
(1) EACH INTERNET SERVICE PROVIDER SHALL COLLECT FROM ITS
ACCOUNT HOLDERS THE MENTAL HEALTH SERVICES ACCESS SURCHARGE
-15- SB26-008

ESTABLISHED BY THE MENTAL HEALTH SERVICES ENTERPRISE PURSUANT
TO SECTION 27-60-606 (2)(a).
(2) THE DUTY TO COLLECT AND REMIT THE MENTAL HEALTH
SERVICES ACCESS SURCHARGE COMMENCES ON JANUARY 1, 2027. THE
MENTAL HEALTH SERVICES ACCESS SURCHARGE MUST BE STATED
SEPARATELY ON THE ACCOUNT HOLDER'S BILLING STATEMENT.
(3) AN INTERNET SERVICE PROVIDER IS LIABLE ONLY FOR THE
MENTAL HEALTH SERVICES ACCESS SURCHARGE COLLECTED PURSUANT TO
THIS PART 6 UNTIL IT IS REMITTED TO THE ENTERPRISE. THE AMOUNT
REMITTED BY THE INTERNET SERVICE PROVIDER MUST REFLECT THE
ACTUAL COLLECTIONS BASED ON THE ACTUAL ACCOUNT HOLDERS BILLED.
(4) (a) AN INTERNET SERVICE PROVIDER SHALL REMIT THE
COLLECTED SURCHARGES TO THE ENTERPRISE ON A MONTHLY BASIS IN A
MANNER ESTABLISHED BY THE ENTERPRISE. THE ENTERPRISE SHALL
ESTABLISH REMITTANCE PROCEDURES BY RULE. AN INTERNET SERVICE
PROVIDER IS SUBJECT TO THE PENALTIES AND PROCEDURES DESCRIBED IN
SUBSECTION (5) OF THIS SECTION FOR THE FAILURE TO COLLECT OR
CORRECTLY REMIT A SURCHARGE IN ACCORDANCE WITH THIS SECTION.
(b) AN INTERNET SERVICE PROVIDER MAY DEDUCT AND RETAIN
ONE PERCENT OF THE SURCHARGES THAT ARE COLLECTED BY THE
INTERNET SERVICE PROVIDER FROM ITS ACCOUNT HOLDERS TO COVER THE
INTERNET SERVICE PROVIDER'S ADMINISTRATIVE COSTS IN COLLECTING
THE SURCHARGE.
(c) THE ENTERPRISE SHALL TRANSMIT THE SURCHARGES REMITTED
TO THE ENTERPRISE PURSUANT TO THIS SECTION TO THE STATE
TREASURER, WHO SHALL CREDIT THE SURCHARGE COLLECTIONS TO THE
MENTAL HEALTH SERVICES ENTERPRISE CASH FUND CREATED IN SECTION
-16- SB26-008

27-60-606 (5). ANY SURCHARGE TRANSMITTED TO THE STATE TREASURER
THAT IS COLLECTED ON BEHALF OF THE MENTAL HEALTH SERVICES
ENTERPRISE IS EXCLUDED FROM STATE FISCAL YEAR SPENDING.
(5) (a) AN INTERNET SERVICE PROVIDER SHALL MAINTAIN A
RECORD OF THE AMOUNT OF EACH MENTAL HEALTH SERVICES ACCESS
SURCHARGE COLLECTED FROM EACH ACCOUNT HOLDER FOR A PERIOD OF
THREE YEARS AFTER THE TIME THE SURCHARGE WAS COLLECTED. AN
INTERNET SERVICE PROVIDER SHALL INCLUDE WITH ITS MONTHLY
REMITTANCE TO THE ENTERPRISE A REPORT OF THE SURCHARGES
INCLUDED IN THE REMITTANCE.
(b) IF AN INTERNET SERVICE PROVIDER FAILS TO TIMELY FILE A
REPORT AND REMIT THE MENTAL HEALTH SERVICES ACCESS SURCHARGE
AS REQUIRED BY THIS SECTION, OR IF AN INTERNET SERVICE PROVIDER
FILES AN INCORRECT REPORT OR FAILS TO REMIT THE CORRECT AMOUNT,
THE ENTERPRISE SHALL ESTIMATE THE AMOUNT OF THE REMITTANCE DUE
FOR THE PERIOD OR PERIODS FOR WHICH THE INTERNET SERVICE PROVIDER
IS DELINQUENT. THE ENTERPRISE SHALL MAKE THE ESTIMATE BASED UPON
THE INFORMATION AVAILABLE. THE ENTERPRISE SHALL COMPUTE AND
ASSESS A PENALTY EQUAL TO FIFTEEN PERCENT OF THE ESTIMATED
DELINQUENT AMOUNT AND SHALL ASSESS INTEREST ON THE DELINQUENT
SURCHARGES AT THE RATE OF ONE PERCENT EACH MONTH FROM THE DATE
WHEN DUE UNTIL THE DATE PAID.
(c) EXCEPT AS PROVIDED IN THIS SECTION AND UNLESS THE TIME
IS EXTENDED BY AGREEMENT PURSUANT TO SUBSECTION (5)(d) OF THIS
SECTION, THE AMOUNT OF A DELINQUENT REMITTANCE AND THE PENALTY
AND INTEREST OWED PURSUANT TO SUBSECTION (5)(b) OF THIS SECTION,
OTHER THAN INTEREST ACCRUING THEREAFTER, MUST BE ASSESSED
-17- SB26-008

WITHIN THREE YEARS AFTER THE DATE THE INCORRECT REPORT WAS FILED
OR THE DELINQUENT REPORT WAS TO BE FILED. THE ENTERPRISE SHALL
NOT FILE A NOTICE OF LIEN, ISSUE A DISTRAINT WARRANT, INSTITUTE A
SUIT FOR COLLECTION, OR TAKE OTHER ACTION TO COLLECT THE AMOUNT
AFTER THE EXPIRATION OF THE APPLICABLE TIME PERIOD UNLESS THE
ENTERPRISE ISSUES A NOTICE OF ASSESSMENT FOR THE AMOUNT WITHIN
THE APPLICABLE TIME PERIOD.
(d) IF, BEFORE THE EXPIRATION OF THE TIME PERIOD PRESCRIBED
FOR THE ASSESSMENT OF DELINQUENT AMOUNTS IN SUBSECTION (5)(c) OF
THIS SECTION, THE ENTERPRISE AND THE INTERNET SERVICE PROVIDER
CONSENT IN WRITING TO AN ASSESSMENT AFTER THE TIME PERIOD, THE
AMOUNT CALCULATED IN ACCORDANCE WITH SUBSECTION (5)(b) OF THIS
SECTION MAY BE ASSESSED AT ANY TIME PRIOR TO THE EXPIRATION OF THE
TIME PERIOD AGREED UPON. THE TIME PERIOD AGREED UPON MAY BE
EXTENDED BY SUBSEQUENT AGREEMENTS IN WRITING MADE BEFORE THE
EXPIRATION OF THE TIME PERIOD PREVIOUSLY AGREED UPON. THE
ENTERPRISE MAY FILE A LIEN AGAINST THE PROPERTY OF THE INTERNET
SERVICE PROVIDER FOR UP TO ONE YEAR AFTER THE EXPIRATION OF ANY
APPLICABLE TIME PERIOD.
(e) THE ENTERPRISE MAY CONDUCT AN AUDIT OF AN INTERNET
SERVICE PROVIDER'S BOOKS AND RECORDS CONCERNING THE COLLECTION
AND REMITTANCE OF THE SURCHARGES AUTHORIZED BY THIS PART 6. A
PUBLIC INSPECTION OF THE AUDIT AND OF DOCUMENTS REVIEWED IN THE
AUDIT IS SUBJECT TO SECTION 24-72-204. THE ENTERPRISE IS RESPONSIBLE
FOR EXPENSES THE ENTERPRISE MAY INCUR TO CONDUCT THE AUDIT. IN
CONNECTION WITH AN AUDIT, AN INTERNET SERVICE PROVIDER SHALL
MAKE RELEVANT RECORDS AVAILABLE TO THE AUDITORS AT NO CHARGE.
-18- SB26-008

THE ENTERPRISE SHALL ADOPT RULES GOVERNING THE AUDIT AND APPEAL
PROCEDURES.
(f) THE ENTERPRISE SHALL DEPOSIT ANY PENALTIES OR INTEREST
COLLECTED PURSUANT TO THIS SUBSECTION (5) IN THE ADULT MENTAL
HEALTH PROGRAM ENTERPRISE CASH FUND.
SECTION 2. Act subject to petition - effective date. This act
takes effect at 12:01 a.m. on the day following the expiration of the
ninety-day period after final adjournment of the general assembly (August
12, 2026, if adjournment sine die is on May 13, 2026); except that, if a
referendum petition is filed pursuant to section 1 (3) of article V of the
state constitution against this act or an item, section, or part of this act
within such period, then the act, item, section, or part will not take effect
unless approved by the people at the general election to be held in
November 2026 and, in such case, will take effect on the date of the
official declaration of the vote thereon by the governor.
-19- SB26-008